Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 5 Construction and Operation of Watershed
Projects, Flood-Control Projects and
Related Recreational Projects
by Counties

22-3-100.
Authority of counties to exercise power of eminent domain.

Every county of the State of Georgia may exercise the power of eminent domain for the purpose of taking and acquiring the property or other interests necessary:

To enable the county to institute and to accomplish the completion of small watershed projects, works of improvements for watersheds, and projects for watershed protection and flood control and prevention under any applicable Act of the State of Georgia or act of the United States;

For certain public parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, or other recreational facilities to be developed in connection with the development or construction of any small watershed project, any project for watershed protection or flood control and prevention, or works of improvements for watersheds; and

To allow for ways of ingress to and egress from any and all such watershed projects, improvements of watershed projects, projects for watershed protection and flood control and prevention, and public parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, or other recreational facilities.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 234, §§ 1-3.

Cross references.

Granting of easements, rights of way to electric utilities for purposes of producing hydroelectric power from dam sites on property owned by governing authority of recreation system, §

36-64-3.1

.

22-3-101.
Condemnation procedure.

For the purposes designated in Code Section 22-3-100, every county of the State of Georgia may proceed to condemn the necessary property or other interest in accordance with the procedures set forth by the pertinent eminent domain statutes of this state and in accordance with all existing laws applicable to the condemnation of private property for public use, including Article 2 of Chapter 2 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 234, § 4.

22-3-102.
Requirement of condemnation of fee simple title to land to be flooded permanently.

In any proceeding under this article, the condemnor shall be required to condemn the fee simple title to all land not otherwise acquired which will be covered by permanent flooding.

History.

Ga. L. 1964, p. 234, § 5.